Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.370

Agreement or order not to prohibit or discriminatorily burden marketing.

No marketing agreement or order or amendment thereto shall prohibit or discriminatorily burden the marketing in its area of any agricultural commodity or product thereof produced in any production area of the United States.

[ 1961 c 256 s 37.]